Utah statutes.
11-25-7.   Expenditures for services and advisers.
The agency may employ engineering, architectural, accounting, collection, or
other services, including services in connection with the servicing of loans
made to participating parties, as may be necessary in the judgment of the
agency for the successful financing of such residential rehabilitation. The
agency may pay the reasonable costs of consulting engineers, architects,
accountants, and construction experts, if, in the judgment of the agency, such
services are necessary to the successful financing of any residential
rehabilitation and if the agency is not able to provide such services. The
agency may employ and fix the compensation of financing consultants, bond
counsel, and other advisers as may be necessary in its judgment to provide for
the issuance and sale of any bonds or bond anticipation notes of the agency.
